Illinois, session 104th, SB1563.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 9-102 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/9-102)  (from Ch. 110, par. 9-102)7    Sec. 9-102. When action may be maintained. 8    (a) The person entitled to the possession of lands or 9tenements may be restored thereto under any of the following 10circumstances:11        (1) When a forcible entry is made thereon.12        (2) When a peaceable entry is made and the possession 13    unlawfully withheld.14        (3) When entry is made into vacant or unoccupied lands 15    or tenements without right or title.16        (4) When any lessee of the lands or tenements, or any 17    person holding under such lessee, holds possession without 18    right after the termination of the lease or tenancy by its 19    own limitation, condition or terms, or by notice to quit 20    or otherwise.21        (5) When a vendee having obtained possession under a 22    written or verbal agreement to purchase lands or 23    tenements, and having failed to comply with the agreement,   SB1563 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09388 JRC 19447 b1    withholds possession thereof, after demand in writing by 2    the person entitled to such possession; however, any 3    agreement for residential real estate entered into on or 4    after July 1, 1987 that is an installment sales contract, 5    as defined in the Installment Sales Contract Act, and the 6    amount unpaid under the terms of the contract at the time 7    of the filing of the foreclosure complaint, including 8    principal and due and unpaid interest, at the rate prior 9    to default, is less than 80% of the original purchase 10    price of the real estate as stated in the contract, as 11    required under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 12    15-1106 of the Illinois Mortgage Foreclosure Law, is 13    subject to foreclosure.14        This amendatory Act of 1993 is declarative of existing 15    law.16        (6) When lands or tenements have been conveyed by any 17    grantor in possession, or sold under the order or judgment 18    of any court in this State, or by virtue of any sale in any 19    mortgage or deed of trust contained and the grantor in 20    possession or party to such order or judgment or to such 21    mortgage or deed of trust, after the expiration of the 22    time of redemption, when redemption is allowed by law, 23    refuses or neglects to surrender possession thereof, after 24    demand in writing by the person entitled thereto, or his 25    or her agent.26        (7) When any property is subject to the provisions of   SB1563 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09388 JRC 19447 b1    the Condominium Property Act, the owner of a unit fails or 2    refuses to pay when due his or her proportionate share of 3    the common expenses of such property, or of any other 4    expenses lawfully agreed upon or any unpaid fine, the 5    Board of Managers or its agents have served the demand set 6    forth in Section 9-104.1 of this Article in the manner 7    provided for in that Section and the unit owner has failed 8    to pay the amount claimed within the time prescribed in 9    the demand; or if the lessor-owner of a unit fails to 10    comply with the leasing requirements prescribed by 11    subsection (n) of Section 18 of the Condominium Property 12    Act or by the declaration, by-laws, and rules and 13    regulations of the condominium, or if a lessee of an owner 14    is in breach of any covenants, rules, regulations, or 15    by-laws of the condominium, and the Board of Managers or 16    its agents have served the demand set forth in Section 17    9-104.2 of this Article in the manner provided in that 18    Section.19        (8) When any property is subject to the provisions of 20    a declaration establishing a common interest community and 21    requiring the unit owner to pay regular or special 22    assessments for the maintenance or repair of common areas 23    owned in common by all of the owners of the common interest 24    community or by the community association and maintained 25    for the use of the unit owners or of any other expenses of 26    the association lawfully agreed upon, and the unit owner   SB1563 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09388 JRC 19447 b1    fails or refuses to pay when due his or her proportionate 2    share of such assessments or expenses and the board or its 3    agents have served the demand set forth in Section 9-104.1 4    of this Article in the manner provided for in that Section 5    and the unit owner has failed to pay the amount claimed 6    within the time prescribed in the demand.7    (b) The provisions of paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of 8Section 9-102 and Section 9-104.3 of this Act shall not apply 9to any common interest community unless (1) the association is 10a not-for-profit corporation or a limited liability company, 11(2) unit owners are authorized to attend meetings of the board 12of directors or board of managers of the association in the 13same manner as provided for condominiums under the Condominium 14Property Act, and (3) the board of managers or board of 15directors of the common interest community association has, 16subsequent to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 171984 voted to have the provisions of this Article apply to such 18association and has delivered or mailed notice of such action 19to the unit owners or unless the declaration of the 20association is recorded after the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of 1985.22    (c) For purposes of this Article:23        (1) "Common interest community" means real estate 24    other than a condominium or cooperative with respect to 25    which any person by virtue of his or her ownership of a 26    partial interest or unit therein is obligated to pay for   SB1563 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09388 JRC 19447 b1    maintenance, improvement, insurance premiums, or real 2    estate taxes of other real estate described in a 3    declaration which is administered by an association.4        (2) "Declaration" means any duly recorded instruments, 5    however designated, that have created a common interest 6    community and any duly recorded amendments to those 7    instruments.8        (3) "Unit" means a physical portion of the common 9    interest community designated by separate ownership or 10    occupancy by boundaries which are described in a 11    declaration.12        (4) "Unit owners' association" or "association" means 13    the association of all owners of units in the common 14    interest community acting pursuant to the declaration.15    (d) If the board of a common interest community elects to 16have the provisions of this Article apply to such association 17or the declaration of the association is recorded after the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of 1985, the provisions 19of subsections (c) through (h) of Section 18.5 of the 20Condominium Property Act applicable to a Master Association 21and condominium unit subject to such association under 22subsections (c) through (h) of Section 18.5 shall be 23applicable to the community associations and to its unit 24owners.25    (e) Nothing in this Article may be construed to prohibit 26law enforcement officials from enforcing the offense of   SB1563 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09388 JRC 19447 b1criminal trespass under Section 21-3 of the Criminal Code of 21963 or any other violation of the Code or to interfere with 3the ability of law enforcement officials to remove persons or 4property from the premises when there is a criminal trespass. 5(Source: P.A. 102-71, eff. 7-9-21.)